Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.050

Provision of goods and services.

(1) In addition to the powers and duties provided in chapter 43.19 RCW, the department shall make available goods and services to support state agencies, and may enter into agreements with any other local or federal governmental agency or entity or a public benefit nonprofit organization, in compliance with RCW 39.34.055, and any tribes located in the state, to furnish such products and services as deemed appropriate by both parties.

(2) The department shall ensure full cost recovery from state agencies, other local or federal governmental agency or entity, public benefit nonprofit organizations, or any tribes located in the state, for activities performed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Cost recovery must ensure that the department is reimbursed its full cost for providing the goods and services furnished as determined by the department. Cost recovery may be collected through the state agency, other governmental entity, nonprofit organization, or through the contractor.

(3) All governmental entities of this state may enter into agreements under this section with the department, unless otherwise prohibited.

[ 2012 c 224 s 6.]